Maine, session 132, LD1302.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §7202, first ¶, as amended by PL 2003, c. 297, §1, is further
amended to read:
The voters of any municipality may petition for consideration of deorganization of the
municipality by following the petition procedure of section 2528, subsection 5. On the
written petition of a number of voters equal to at least 50% of the number of votes cast in
the municipality at the last gubernatorial election, but in no case less than 10, requesting a
municipal meeting for the purpose of discussing and determining whether the municipality
should deorganize, the municipal officers shall call and hold a special meeting in the
manner provided for the calling and holding of town meetings or city elections to discuss
deorganization of the municipality and to decide whether to develop a deorganization
procedure.
Page 1 - 132LR1491(02)